District of Columbia statutes.
22-3571.01

Fines for criminal offenses.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, and except as provided in § 22-3571.02, a defendant who has been found guilty of an offense under the District of Columbia Official Code punishable by imprisonment may be sentenced to pay a fine as provided in this section.

(b)

An individual who has been found guilty of such an offense may be fined not more than the greatest of:

(1)

$100 if the offense is punishable by imprisonment for 10 days or less; (2) $250 if the offense is punishable by imprisonment for 30 days, or one month, or less but more than 10 days;

(3)

$500 if the offense is punishable by imprisonment for 90 days, or 3 months, or less but more than 30 days;

(4)

$1,000 if the offense is punishable by imprisonment for 180 days, or 6 months, or less but more than 90 days;

(5)

$2,500 if the offense is punishable by imprisonment for one year or less but more than 180 days;

(6)

$12,500 if the offense is punishable by imprisonment for 5 years or less but more than one year;

(7)

$25,000 if the offense is punishable by imprisonment for 10 years or less but more than 5 years;

(8)

$37,500 if the offense is punishable by imprisonment for 15 years or less but more than 10 years;

(9)

$50,000 if the offense is punishable by imprisonment for 20 years or less but more than 15 years;

(10)

$75,000 if the offense is punishable by imprisonment for 30 years or less but more than 20 years;

(11)

$125,000 if the offense is punishable by imprisonment for more than 30 years; or

(12)

$250,000 if the offense resulted in death.

(c)

An organization that has been found guilty of an offense punishable by imprisonment for 6 months or more may be fined not more than the greatest of:

(1)

Twice the maximum amount specified in the law setting forth the penalty for the offense;

(2)

Twice the applicable amount under subsection (b) of this section; or

(3)

Twice the applicable amount under § 22-3571.02(a).

June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 101, 60 DCR 2064
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 101 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
This section is referenced in § 2-381.09, § 2-1402.66, § 4-1321.07, § 7-2507.06, § 8-111.09, § 8-1906, § 16-1005, § 16-1024, § 16-2336, § 16-2348, § 16-2364, § 16-2394, § 16-5103, § 18-112, § 20-102, § 21-591, § 22-301, § 22-302, § 22-303, § 22-401, § 22-402, § 22-403, § 22-404, § 22-404.01, § 22-404.02, § 22-404.03, § 22-405, § 22-406, § 22-407, § 22-501, § 22-601, § 22-704, § 22-712, § 22-713, § 22-722, § 22-723, § 22-801, § 22-811, § 22-851, § 22-902, § 22-936, § 22-951, § 22-1006.01, § 22-1012, § 22-1101, § 22-1102, § 22-1211, § 22-1301, § 22-1307, § 22-1312, § 22-1314.02, § 22-1319, § 22-1321, § 22-1322, § 22-1323, § 22-1341, § 22-1402, § 22-1403, § 22-1404, § 22-1405, § 22-1406, § 22-1409, § 22-1502, § 22-1510, § 22-1513, § 22-1514, § 22-1701, § 22-1702, § 22-1703, § 22-1704, § 22-1705, § 22-1706, § 22-1708, § 22-1713, § 22-1803, § 22-1804a, § 22-1805a, § 22-1807, § 22-1810, § 22-1837, § 22-1901, § 22-1931, § 22-2001, § 22-2104, § 22-2105, § 22-2106, § 22-2107, § 22-2201, § 22-2304, § 22-2402, § 22-2403, § 22-2404, § 22-2405, § 22-2501, § 22-2511, § 22-2601, § 22-2603.03, § 22-2701, § 22-2704, § 22-2705, § 22-2706, § 22-2707, § 22-2708, § 22-2709, § 22-2710, § 22-2711, § 22-2712, § 22-2716, § 22-2722, § 22-2731, § 22-2752, § 22-2801, § 22-2802, § 22-2803, § 22-3002, § 22-3003, § 22-3004, § 22-3005, § 22-3006, § 22-3008, § 22-3009, § 22-3009.01, § 22-3009.02, § 22-3009.03, § 22-3009.04, § 22-3010, § 22-3010.01, § 22-3010.02, § 22-3013, § 22-3014, § 22-3015, § 22-3016, § 22-3103, § 22-3134, § 22-3154, § 22-3155, § 22-3212, § 22-3213, § 22-3214, § 22-3214.01, § 22-3214.02, § 22-3215, § 22-3216, § 22-3218.04, § 22-3222, § 22-3223, § 22-3224, § 22-3225.04, § 22-3226.10, § 22-3227.03, § 22-3231, § 22-3232, § 22-3233, § 22-3234, § 22-3242, § 22-3251, § 22-3252, § 22-3301, § 22-3302, § 22-3303, § 22-3305, § 22-3306, § 22-3307, § 22-3309, § 22-3310, § 22-3311, § 22-3312.04, § 22-3318, § 22-3319, § 22-3402, § 22-3531, § 22-3571.02, § 22-4015, § 22-4134, § 22-4331, § 22-4402, § 22-4404, § 22-4502, § 22-4503, § 22-4504, § 22-4514, § 22-4515, § 22-4515a, § 23-542, § 23-543, § 23-703, § 23-1108, § 23-1110, § 23-1111, § 23-1327, § 23-1328, § 23-1329, § 24-403.01, § 25-434, § 25-772, § 25-785, § 25-831, § 25-1001, § 28-2305, § 28-3313, § 28-3817, § 28-4505, § 28-4506, § 28-4607, § 32-213, § 32-1011, § 32-1307, § 47-102, § 47-391.03, § 47-821, § 47-828, § 47-850.02, § 47-861, § 47-863, § 47-1805.04, § 47-2014, § 47-2018, § 47-2106, § 47-2406, § 47-2408, § 47-2409, § 47-2421, § 47-2707, § 47-2808, § 47-2839.01, § 47-2846, § 47-2850, § 47-2853.27, § 47-2883.04, § 47-2884.16, § 47-2885.20, § 47-2886.14, § 47-2887.14, § 47-3409, § 47-3719, § 47-4101, § 47-4102, § 47-4103, § 47-4104, § 47-4105, § 47-4106, § 47-4107, § 47-4405, § 47-4406, § 48-711, § 48-904.01, § 48-904.02, § 48-904.03, § 48-904.03a, § 48-904.07, § 48-904.10, § 48-921.02, § 48-1005, § 48-1103, § 50-329.05, § 50-405, § 50-607, § 50-1215, § 50-1301.74, § 50-1301.75, § 50-1331.08, § 50-1401.01, § 50-1401.02, § 50-1403.01, § 50-1403.03, § 50-1501.04, § 50-1507.03, § 50-1912, § 50-2201.03, § 50-2201.04, § 50-2201.04b, § 50-2201.05b, § 50-2201.05c, § 50-2201.05d, § 50-2201.28, § 50-2203.01, § 50-2206.13, § 50-2206.15, § 50-2206.16, § 50-2206.18, § 50-2206.32, § 50-2206.34, § 50-2206.36, § 50-2302.03, § 50-2303.02, § 50-2421.04, § 50-2421.09, § 50-2421.10, and § 50-2632.